Vermont, session 2025-2026, H679.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 20 V.S.A. § 3b is added to read:
§ 3b. FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE FOR IMPACTED MUNICIPALITIES
(a) A municipality that has been impacted by an all-hazard flooding event
shall be eligible for financial assistance from the Division of Emergency
Management to cover expenses incurred due to the all-hazard while awaiting
reimbursement from the Federal Emergency Management Agency, including:
(1) emergency response costs;
(2) temporary housing and shelter services; and
(3) local infrastructure repairs that are necessary to maintain public
safety.
(b) A municipality that has been impacted by an all-hazard flooding event
shall be eligible for State funding to cover all of the local match requirements
required by federal law or the Federal Emergency Management Agency for
flood recovery and assistance.
Sec. 2. 20 V.S.A. § 52 is added to read:
§ 52. FLOOD-PRONE PROPERTIES; ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS
(a) Voluntary Buyout Program. The Division of Emergency Management
and the Agency of Commerce and Community Development shall establish
and maintain the Voluntary Buyout Program for flood-prone properties. The
Program shall allow a municipality, at the request of the owner of a flood-
VT LEG #386385 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.679
2026 Page 3 of 8
prone property, to apply for funding to cover the purchase price of the
property. The purchase price shall be the full fair market value of the flood-
prone property.
(b) Homeowner Assistance Program. The Division of Emergency
Management and the Agency of Commerce and Community Development
shall establish and maintain the Homeowner Assistance Program to provide
financial support to the owners of residential properties for:
(1) construction projects to elevate a residential building in flood-prone
areas to mitigate the risk of future damage;
(2) relocation to other permanent housing in response to flood damage;
and
(3) the rebuilding of a residential building using flood-resilient materials
or designs, including floodproof foundations and water-resistant construction.
Sec. 3. 19 V.S.A. § 306 is amended to read:
§ 306. APPROPRIATION; STATE AID FOR TOWN HIGHWAYS
* * *
(i) Municipal Mitigation Assistance Program.
(1) The Agency shall administer the Municipal Mitigation Assistance
Program. Through the Program, the Agency shall:
VT LEG #386385 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.679
2026 Page 4 of 8
(A) provide assistance and grants to municipalities for environmental
mitigation projects related to stormwater and highways and for the
establishment and operation of stormwater utilities; and
(B) provide funding for rural and flood-prone municipalities to:
(i) upgrade infrastructure, including improvements to town
highways, bridges, and culverts, to increase the capacity of town highway
infrastructure to handle high-volume water flow; and
(ii) create and maintain emergency access routes for use during an
all-hazard event, as defined by 20 V.S.A. chapter 1.
(2) Municipalities shall match grants with local funds sufficient to cover
20 percent of the project costs, except that the Agency may issue grants for the
establishment or operation of stormwater utilities without requiring a local
match.
(3) From the operating expenses appropriated for the Program, the
Agency is authorized to pay costs billed to the Agency by municipal
stormwater utilities.
* * *
Sec. 4. 19 V.S.A. § 320 is added to read:
§ 320. AGENCY SUPPORT FOR CERTAIN TOWN HIGHWAY
PROJECTS
VT LEG #386385 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.679
2026 Page 5 of 8
(a) Design of stormwater management systems. The Agency shall provide
technical assistance to municipalities for the design of upgrades for stormwater
management systems affecting town highways, including the design of larger
culverts, reinforced ditches, drainage systems, and any other stormwater
management system that is capable of managing increased water flow due to
severe weather events.
(b) Technical assistance for specialized improvements. The Agency shall
provide technical assistance to municipalities for specialized flood resiliency
projects, including the alteration of bridges in flood-prone areas and the
removal of dams that pose a significant risk to surrounding communities.
(c) Technical assistance for town highway improvements. The Agency
shall offer technical assistance to municipalities for:
(1) roadwork and infrastructure adaptations for severe weather events;
and
(2) identifying and applying for federal, State, and regional grants to
support local infrastructure projects.
(d) Asset Management System. The Agency shall create and maintain the
Asset Management System to track:
(1) availability of equipment that may be used to respond to an all-
hazard flood event, including vehicles, water pumps, and sandbags;
VT LEG #386385 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.679
2026 Page 6 of 8
(2) equipment operators and personnel who are trained for disaster
management and response; and
(3) locations of critical resources for efficient deployment of those
resources during an emergency.
(e) Provision of flood response fleet vehicles. The Agency shall procure
and maintain a fleet of heavy machinery, including vactor trucks, necessary to
assist municipalities with debris removal from flood-impacted areas and the
maintenance of stormwater and flood mitigation systems to prevent future
damage. The fleet of heavy machinery shall be stored and maintained
regionally throughout the State.
Sec. 5. 10 V.S.A. § 1007 is added to read:
§ 1007. AGENCY DUTIES; FLOOD RESILIENCY AND STREAM FLOW
PROJECTS
The Agency of Natural Resources shall establish a program to implement
and improve stream flow projects in response to flood risks, including:
(1) the clearing debris from surface waters to prevent the blockage of
waterways, flood plains, or other flood resiliency systems;
(2) the restoration of degraded flood-retention systems and reservoirs to
their original specifications;
VT LEG #386385 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.679
2026 Page 7 of 8
(3) the alteration of rivers or river beds to mitigate flood risk; and
(4) the permitting of alternative, cost-effective flood mitigation solutions
to allow for expedited project implementation.
Sec. 6. 10 V.S.A. § 1429 is added to read:
§ 1429. AGENCY DUTIES; FLOOD RESILIENCY AND RIVER
CORRIDOR NATURALIZATION PROJECTS
The Agency of Natural Resources shall establish a program to designate
areas at risk of severe flooding and create floodways within portions of those
designated areas to mitigate the damage caused by severe flooding. Through
the program, the Agency shall also support riverbank naturalization projects to
enhance ecological resilience, reduce erosion, and improve flood mitigation
within designated areas.
Sec. 7. DIVISION OF EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT; POSITIONS;
APPROPRIATION
(a) The following positions are created in the Division of Emergency
Management:
(1) one full-time, exempt Municipal Grant Liaison; and
(2) one full-time, exempt Flood Mitigation Technician.
(b) The Municipal Grant Liaison shall be dedicated to grant research, grant
applications support, coordination between municipal corporations and the
Federal Emergency Management Agency, and direct assistance to municipal
VT LEG #386385 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.679
2026 Page 8 of 8
corporations for the acquisition of grants and other funding sources for flood
relief and recovery efforts. The Flood Mitigation Technician shall be
dedicated to providing or supporting engineering analyses for flood mitigation
projects, oversight of municipal flood remediation and recovery projects, and
managing technical assistance to municipal corporations for flood recovery.
Sec. 8. APPROPRIATIONS
In fiscal year 2027, the following sums are appropriated to the Department
of Public Safety from the General Fund:
(1) $225,000.00 to support the two positions created in Sec. 7 of this act;
and
(2) $5,000,000.00 to be used by Vermont Emergency Management for
general flood recovery projects in Essex County and Orleans County, including
support for municipal recovery, infrastructure, or assistance of individuals.
Sec. 9. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386385 v.2